Nebraska, session 109, LB1191.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1191 LB1191
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 77-5723, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-5723 (1) In order to utilize the incentives set forth in the
Nebraska Advantage Act, the taxpayer shall file an application, on a form
developed by the Tax Commissioner, requesting an agreement with the Tax
Commissioner.
(2) The application shall contain:
(a) A written statement describing the plan of employment and
investment for a qualified business in this state;
(b) Sufficient documents, plans, and specifications as required by
the Tax Commissioner to support the plan and to define a project;
(c) If more than one location within this state is involved,
sufficient documentation to show that the employment and investment at
different locations are interdependent parts of the plan. A headquarters
shall be presumed to be interdependent with each other location directly
controlled by such headquarters. A showing that the parts of the plan
would be considered parts of a unitary business for corporate income tax
purposes shall not be sufficient to show interdependence for the purposes
of this subdivision;
(d) A nonrefundable application fee of one thousand dollars for a
tier 1 project, two thousand five hundred dollars for a tier 2, tier 3,
or tier 5 project, five thousand dollars for a tier 4 project, and ten
thousand dollars for a tier 6 project. The fee shall be credited to the
Nebraska Incentives Fund; and
(e) A timetable showing the expected sales tax refunds and what year
they are expected to be claimed. The timetable shall include both direct
refunds due to investment and credits taken as sales tax refunds as
accurately as possible.
The application and all supporting information shall be confidential
except for the name of the taxpayer, the location of the project, the
amounts of increased employment and investment, and the information
-2-

LB1191 LB1191
2026 2026
required to be reported by sections 77-5731 and 77-5734.
(3) An application must be complete to establish the date of the
application. An application shall be considered complete once it contains
the items listed in subsection (2) of this section, regardless of the Tax
Commissioner's additional needs pertaining to information or
clarification in order to approve or not approve the application.
(4) Once satisfied that the plan in the application defines a
project consistent with the purposes stated in the Nebraska Advantage Act
in one or more qualified business activities within this state, that the
taxpayer and the plan will qualify for benefits under the act, and that
the required levels of employment and investment for the project will be
met within the applicable time period prescribed in this subsection, the
Tax Commissioner shall approve the application. For a tier 6 project
submitted and approved by the Tax Commissioner prior to December 1, 2020,
or for any tier 1 or tier 3 project, the required levels of employment
and investment shall be met prior to the end of the fourth year after the
year in which the application was submitted. For a tier 6 project
submitted and approved by the Tax Commissioner on or after December 1,
2020, or for any tier 2, tier 4, or tier 5 project, the required levels
of employment and investment shall be met prior to the end of the ninth
sixth year after the year in which the application was submitted. For any
tier 2, tier 4, or tier 5 project, the required levels of employment and
investment shall be met prior to the end of the sixth year after the year
in which the application was submitted. For a tier 5 project that is
sequential to a tier 2 large data center project, the required level of
investment shall be met prior to the end of the fourth year after the
expiration of the tier 2 large data center project entitlement period
relating to sales tax exemptions.
(5) The Tax Commissioner shall make his or her determination to
approve or not approve an application within one hundred eighty days
after the date of the application. If the Tax Commissioner requests, by
-3-

LB1191 LB1191
2026 2026
mail or by electronic means, additional information or clarification from
the taxpayer in order to make his or her determination, such one-hundred-
eighty-day period shall be tolled from the time the Tax Commissioner
makes the request to the time he or she receives the requested
information or clarification from the taxpayer. The taxpayer and the Tax
Commissioner may also agree to extend the one-hundred-eighty-day period.
If the Tax Commissioner fails to make his or her determination within the
prescribed one-hundred-eighty-day period, the application shall be deemed
approved.
(6) Within one hundred eighty days after approval of the
application, the Tax Commissioner shall prepare and mail a written
agreement to the taxpayer for the taxpayer's signature. The taxpayer and
the Tax Commissioner shall enter into a written agreement. The taxpayer
shall agree to complete the project, and the Tax Commissioner, on behalf
of the State of Nebraska, shall designate the approved plan of the
taxpayer as a project and, in consideration of the taxpayer's agreement,
agree to allow the taxpayer to use the incentives contained in the
Nebraska Advantage Act. The application, and all supporting
documentation, to the extent approved, shall be considered a part of the
agreement. The agreement shall state:
(a) The levels of employment and investment required by the act for
the project;
(b) The time period under the act in which the required levels must
be met;
(c) The documentation the taxpayer will need to supply when claiming
an incentive under the act;
(d) The date the application was filed; and
(e) A requirement that the company update the Department of Revenue
annually on any changes in plans or circumstances which affect the
timetable of sales tax refunds as set out in the application. If the
company fails to comply with this requirement, the Tax Commissioner may
-4-

LB1191 LB1191
2026 2026
defer any pending sales tax refunds until the company does comply.
(7) The incentives contained in section 77-5725 shall be in lieu of
the tax credits allowed by the Nebraska Advantage Rural Development Act
for any project. In computing credits under the act, any investment or
employment which is eligible for benefits or used in determining benefits
under the Nebraska Advantage Act shall be subtracted from the increases
computed for determining the credits under section 77-27,188. New
investment or employment at a project location that results in the
meeting or maintenance of the employment or investment requirements, the
creation of credits, or refunds of taxes under the Employment and
Investment Growth Act shall not be considered new investment or
employment for purposes of the Nebraska Advantage Act. The use of
carryover credits under the Employment and Investment Growth Act, the
Invest Nebraska Act, the Nebraska Advantage Rural Development Act, or the
Quality Jobs Act shall not preclude investment and employment from being
considered new investment or employment under the Nebraska Advantage Act.
The use of property tax exemptions at the project under the Employment
and Investment Growth Act shall not preclude investment not eligible for
the property tax exemption from being considered new investment under the
Nebraska Advantage Act.
(8) A taxpayer and the Tax Commissioner may enter into agreements
for more than one project and may include more than one project in a
single agreement. The projects may be either sequential or concurrent. A
project may involve the same location as another project. No new
employment or new investment shall be included in more than one project
for either the meeting of the employment or investment requirements or
the creation of credits. When projects overlap and the plans do not
clearly specify, then the taxpayer shall specify in which project the
employment or investment belongs.
(9) The taxpayer may request that an agreement be modified if the
modification is consistent with the purposes of the act and does not
-5-

LB1191 LB1191
2026 2026
require a change in the description of the project. An agreement may not
be modified to a tier that would grant a higher level of benefits to the
taxpayer or to a tier 1 project. Once satisfied that the modification to
the agreement is consistent with the purposes stated in the act, the Tax
Commissioner and taxpayer may amend the agreement. For a tier 6 project,
the taxpayer must agree to limit the project to qualified activities
allowable under tier 2 and tier 4.
Sec. 2. Section 77-5735, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-5735 (1) The changes made in sections 77-5703, 77-5708, 77-5712,
77-5714, 77-5715, 77-5723, 77-5725, 77-5726, 77-5727, and 77-5731 by Laws
2008, LB895, and sections 77-5707.01, 77-5719.01, and 77-5719.02 apply to
all applications filed on and after April 18, 2008. For all applications
filed prior to such date, the provisions of the Nebraska Advantage Act as
they existed immediately prior to such date apply.
(2) The changes made in sections 77-5725 and 77-5726 by Laws 2010,
LB879, apply to all applications filed on or after July 15, 2010. For all
applications filed prior to such date, the taxpayer may make a one-time
election, within the time period prescribed by the Tax Commissioner, to
have the changes made in sections 77-5725 and 77-5726 by Laws 2010,
LB879, apply to such taxpayer's application, or in the absence of such an
election, the provisions of the Nebraska Advantage Act as they existed
immediately prior to July 15, 2010, apply to such application.
(3) The changes made in sections 77-5707, 77-5715, 77-5719, and
77-5725 by Laws 2010, LB918, apply to all applications filed on or after
July 15, 2010. For all applications filed prior to such date, the
provisions of the Nebraska Advantage Act as they existed immediately
prior to such date apply.
(4) The changes made in sections 77-5701, 77-5703, 77-5705, 77-5715,
77-5723, 77-5725, 77-5726, and 77-5727 by Laws 2012, LB1118, apply to all
applications filed on or after March 8, 2012. For all applications filed
-6-

LB1191 LB1191
2026 2026
prior to such date, the provisions of the Nebraska Advantage Act as they
existed immediately prior to such date apply.
(5) The changes made in sections 77-5707.01, 77-5709, 77-5712,
77-5719, 77-5720, 77-5723, and 77-5726 by Laws 2013, LB34, apply to all
applications filed on or after September 6, 2013. For all applications
filed prior to such date, the provisions of the Nebraska Advantage Act as
they existed immediately prior to such date apply.
(6) The changes made in section 77-5726 by Laws 2017, LB161, apply
to all applications filed before, on, or after August 24, 2017.
(7) The changes made in sections 77-5705, 77-5723, 77-5725, 77-5726,
and 77-5727 and in subsections (3), (6), and (7) of section 77-5731 by
Laws 2022, LB1150, apply to any agreement entered into under the Nebraska
Advantage Act that is still active on January 1, 2023, if the taxpayer
makes a one-time election, within the time period prescribed by the Tax
Commissioner, to have such changes apply to such taxpayer's agreement. In
the absence of such an election, the provisions of such sections and
subsections as they existed immediately prior to January 1, 2023, shall
apply to such agreement. For each election made under this subsection,
the Tax Commissioner shall disclose such election, the identity of the
taxpayer, and the location of the taxpayer's project to each municipality
in which the project is located. The Tax Commissioner shall make such
disclosures within thirty days after the election.
(8) The changes made in sections 77-5723 and 77-5727 by Laws 2024,
LB1088, apply to any agreement entered into under the Nebraska Advantage
Act that is still active on July 19, 2024, if the taxpayer makes a one-
time election, within the time period prescribed by the Tax Commissioner,
to have such changes apply to such taxpayer's agreement. In the absence
of such an election, the provisions of such sections as they existed
immediately prior to July 19, 2024, shall apply to such agreement.
(9) The changes made in section 77-5723 by this legislative bill
apply to any agreement for a tier 6 project entered into under the
-7-

LB1191 LB1191
2026 2026
Nebraska Advantage Act that is still active on the effective date of this
act if a taxpayer makes a one-time election and pays a fee of ninety
thousand dollars, within the time period prescribed by the Tax
Commissioner, to have such changes apply to such taxpayer's agreement. In
the absence of such an election, the provisions of such section as it
existed immediately prior to the effective date of this act shall apply
to such agreement.
Sec. 3. Original sections 77-5723 and 77-5735, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-8-